Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.380

Exceptions—Confirmation.

The report of sale may be excepted to in writing by any party entitled to a share of the proceeds. If the sale be confirmed, the order of confirmation shall direct the referees to execute conveyances and take securities pursuant to such sale.

[Code 1881 s 589; 1877 p 123 s 594; 1869 p 140 s 543; RRS s 875.]